fi: Tehosekoittimen kannun materiaali: Borosilikaattilasi; Lasi; Muovi; Polykarbonaatti; Ruostumaton teräs; Tritan-muovi; Muu
tr: Blender kabı malzemesi: Borosilikat cam; Cam; Plastik; Polikarbonat; Paslanmaz çelik; Tritan plastik; Diğer
nl: Materiaal van blenderkan: Hittebestendig glas; Glas; Plastic; Polycarbonaat; Roestvrij staal; Tritan-plastic; Overig
pt-PT: Material do copo do liquidificador: Vidro borossilicato; Vidro; Plástico; Policarbonato; Aço inoxidável; Plástico Tritan; Outro
pl: Materiał dzbanka blendera: Szkło borokrzemowe; Szkło; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliwęglan; Stal nierdzewna; Tworzywo Tritan; Pozostałe
zh-CN: 搅拌杯材质: 硼硅玻璃; 玻璃; 塑料; 聚碳酸酯; 不锈钢; Tritan 塑料; 其他
nb: Materiale i blandekanne: Borsilikatglass; Glass; Plast; Polykarbonat; Rustfritt stål; Tritanplast; Annet
vi: Vật liệu cối máy xay: Thủy tinh borosilicat; Thủy tinh; Nhựa; Polycarbonate; Thép không gỉ; Nhựa Tritan; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál nádoby mixéra: Borosilikátové sklo; Sklo; Plast; Polykarbonát; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Tritánový plast; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal posude blendera: Borosilikatno staklo; Staklo; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Nehrđajući čelik; Tritan plastika; Ostalo
sv: Material för blenderkanna: Borosilikatglas; Glas; Plast; Polykarbonat; Rostfritt stål; Tritanplast; Övrigt
ru: Материал чаши блендера: Боросиликатное стекло; Стекло; Пластик; Поликарбонат; Нержавеющая сталь; Тритановый пластик; Другой
ko: 블렌더 용기 재질: 붕규산 유리; 유리; 플라스틱; 폴리카보네이트; 스테인리스 스틸; 트리탄 플라스틱; 기타
ro-RO: Materialul vasului blenderului: Sticlă borosilicată; Sticlă; Plastic; Policarbonat; Oțel inoxidabil; Plastic Tritan; Altele
el: Υλικό κανάτας μπλέντερ: Βοριοπυριτικό γυαλί; Γυαλί; Πλαστικό; Πολυανθρακικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Πλαστικό Tritan; Άλλο
de: Material des Mixerbehälters: Borosilikatglas; Glas; Kunststoff; Polycarbonat; Edelstahl; Tritan-Kunststoff; Sonstiges
en: Blender jar material: Borosilicate glass; Glass; Plastic; Polycarbonate; Stainless steel; Tritan plastic; Other
cs: Materiál nádoby mixéru: Borosilikátové sklo; Sklo; Plast; Polykarbonát; Nerezová ocel; Tritanový plast; Jiné
bg-BG: Материал на каната на блендера: Боросиликатно стъкло; Стъкло; Пластмаса; Поликарбонат; Неръждаема стомана; Тританова пластмаса; Друго
zh-TW: 攪拌杯材質: 硼矽酸鹽玻璃; 玻璃; 塑膠; 聚碳酸酯; 不銹鋼; 改質 PCT 塑膠; 其他
ja: ブレンダージャーの素材: ホウケイ酸ガラス; ガラス; プラスチック; ポリカーボネート; ステンレススチール; トライタンプラスチック; その他
hu: Turmixgép kancsójának anyaga: Boroszilikát üveg; Üveg; Műanyag; Polikarbonát; Rozsdamentes acél; Tritán műanyag; Egyéb
es: Material de la jarra de la licuadora: Vidrio de borosilicato; Vidrio; Plástico; Policarbonato; Acero inoxidable; Plástico Tritan; Otros
it: Materiale del bicchiere del frullatore: Vetro borosilicato; Vetro; Plastica; Policarbonato; Acciaio inossidabile; Plastica Tritan; Altro
lt-LT: Plaktuvo indo medžiaga: Borosilikatinis stiklas; Stiklas; Plastikas; Polikarbonatas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Tritano plastikas; Kita
pt-BR: Material do copo do liquidificador: Vidro borossilicato; Vidro; Plástico; Policarbonato; Aço inoxidável; Plástico Tritan; Outro
th: วัสดุของโถปั่น: แก้วบอโรซิลิเคท; แก้ว; พลาสติก; โพลีคาร์บอเนต; เหล็กสเตนเลส; พลาสติกไทรทัน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Material posode mešalnika: Borosilkatno steklo; Steklo; Plastika; Polikarbonat; Nerjavno jeklo; Tritanska plastika; Druga
fr: Matériau du récipient du blender: Verre borosilicate; Verre; Plastique; Polycarbonate; Acier inoxydable; Plastique Tritan; Autre
da: Blenderkandes materiale: Borosilikatglas; Glas; Plast; Polycarbonat; Rustfrit stål; Tritanplast; Andet